Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TASK FORCE TO IMPROVE VETERANS' ACCESS TO MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES IN RURAL AREAS.new text end new text begin The commissioner of veterans affairs must convene a task force to improve veterans' access to mental health services in rural areas. The task force must consider and make recommendations regarding issues relating to veterans mental health. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs to administer the task force under section 1. The base for this appropriation is $....... in fiscal year 2028 and $....... in fiscal year 2029. new text end